Utah statutes.
58-77-603.   Prohibited practices.

A Direct-entry midwife may not:

(1)  administer a prescription drug to a client in a manner that violates this chapter;

(2)  effect any type of surgical delivery except for the cutting of an emergency episiotomy;

(3)  administer any type of epidural, spinal, or caudal anesthetic, or any type of narcotic analgesia;

(4)  use forceps or a vacuum extractor;

(5)  manually remove the placenta, except in an emergency that presents an immediate threat to the life of the client; or

(6)  induce abortion.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2005 General Session

